Maryland, session 2026, HB0908.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
SUBTITLE 27. FAILURE TO RESTRICT DISTRIBUTION OF SEXUAL MATERIAL
HARMFUL TO MINORS.
3–2701.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0908*

HOUSE BILL 908
(B) “COMMERCIAL ENTITY” INCLUDES A CORPORATION, A LIMITED
LIABILITY COMPANY, A PARTNERSHIP, A LIMITED PARTNERSHIP, A SOLE
PROPRIETORSHIP, OR ANY OTHER LEGALLY RECOGNIZED ENTITY.
(C) “DIGITAL IDENTIFICATION” MEANS INFORMATION STORED ON A
DIGITAL NETWORK THAT MAY BE ACCESSED BY A COMMERCIAL ENTITY AND SERVES
AS PROOF OF THE IDENTITY OF AN INDIVIDUAL.
(D) “DISTRIBUTE” MEANS TO ISSUE, SELL, GIVE, PUBLISH, PROVIDE,
DELIVER, TRANSFER, TRANSMIT, CIRCULATE, OR DISSEMINATE BY ANY MEANS.
(E) “NEWS–GATHERING ORGANIZATION EMPLOYEE” MEANS:
(1) AN EMPLOYEE OF A NEWSPAPER, NEWS PUBLICATION, OR NEWS
SOURCE, WHETHER IN PRINT OR ON AN ONLINE OR MOBILE PLATFORM, OF CURRENT
NEWS AND PUBLIC INTEREST, WHO IS ACTING WITHIN THE COURSE AND SCOPE OF
THAT EMPLOYMENT, WHO CAN PROVIDE DOCUMENTATION OF THE EMPLOYMENT;
OR
(2) AN EMPLOYEE OF A RADIO BROADCAST STATION, TELEVISION
BROADCAST STATION, CABLE TELEVISION OPERATOR, OR WIRE SERVICE, WHO IS
ACTING WITHIN THE COURSE AND SCOPE OF THAT EMPLOYMENT, WHO CAN PROVIDE
DOCUMENTATION OF THE EMPLOYMENT.
(F) “OBSCENE” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 11–203 OF THE CRIMINAL
LAW ARTICLE.
(G) “PUBLISH” MEANS TO COMMUNICATE OR MAKE INFORMATION
AVAILABLE TO ANOTHER PERSON OR ENTITY ON A PUBLICLY AVAILABLE WEBSITE.
(H) “REASONABLE AGE VERIFICATION METHODS” MEANS VERIFYING THAT
A PERSON SEEKING TO ACCESS SEXUAL MATERIAL HARMFUL TO MINORS IS AT LEAST
18 YEARS OLD BY REQUIRING THE PERSON ATTEMPTING TO ACCESS THE MATERIAL
TO COMPLY WITH A COMMERCIAL AGE VERIFICATION SYSTEM THAT VERIFIES IN AT
LEAST ONE OF THE FOLLOWING WAYS:
(1) GOVERNMENT–ISSUED IDENTIFICATION;
(2) ANY COMMERCIALLY REASONABLE METHOD THAT RELIES ON
PUBLIC OR PRIVATE TRANSACTIONAL DATA TO VERIFY THAT THE PERSON
ATTEMPTING TO ACCESS THE INFORMATION IS AT LEAST 18 YEARS OLD; OR

HOUSE BILL 908 3
(3) DIGITAL IDENTIFICATION.
(I) “SEXUAL MATERIAL HARMFUL TO MINORS” MEANS MATERIAL THAT:
(1) IS OBSCENE; AND
(2) EXPLOITS, IS DEVOTED TO, OR PRINCIPALLY CONSISTS OF
DESCRIPTIONS OF ACTUAL, SIMULATED, OR ANIMATED DISPLAYS OR DEPICTIONS
OF:
(I) AN INDIVIDUAL’S PUBIC HAIR, ANUS, GENITALS, OR THE
NIPPLES OF THE FEMALE BREAST;
(II) TOUCHING, CARESSING, OR FONDLING OF THE NIPPLES,
BREASTS, BUTTOCKS, ANUSES, OR GENITALS; OR
(III) SEXUAL INTERCOURSE, MASTURBATION, SODOMY,
BESTIALITY, ORAL COPULATION, FLAGELLATION, EXCRETORY FUNCTIONS,
EXHIBITIONS, OR ANY OTHER SEXUAL ACT.
(J) “SUBSTANTIAL PORTION” MEANS MORE THAN ONE–THIRD OF THE
TOTAL MATERIAL ON A WEBSITE.
(K) (1) “TRANSACTIONAL DATA” MEANS A SEQUENCE OF INFORMATION
THAT DOCUMENTS AN EXCHANGE, AN AGREEMENT, OR A TRANSFER BETWEEN AN
INDIVIDUAL, A COMMERCIAL ENTITY, OR A THIRD PARTY USED FOR THE PURPOSE
OF SATISFYING A REQUEST OR AN EVENT.
(2) “TRANSACTIONAL DATA” INCLUDES RECORDS FROM MORTGAGE,
EDUCATION, AND EMPLOYMENT ENTITIES.
3–2702.
(A) THIS SECTION MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO IMPOSE LIABILITY ON AN
INTERNET SERVICE PROVIDER OR ITS AFFILIATES OR SUBSIDIARIES, A SEARCH
ENGINE, OR A CLOUD SERVICE PROVIDER SOLELY FOR PROVIDING ACCESS OR
CONNECTION TO OR FROM A WEBSITE OR OTHER INFORMATION OR CONTENT ON
THE INTERNET OR A FACILITY, SYSTEM, OR NETWORK NOT UNDER THE SERVICE
PROVIDER’S CONTROL, INCLUDING TRANSMISSION, DOWNLOADING, INTERMEDIATE
STORAGE, ACCESS SOFTWARE, OR OTHER SERVICE TO THE EXTENT THAT THE
SERVICE PROVIDER IS NOT RESPONSIBLE FOR THE CREATION OR COMMUNICATION
OF THE SEXUAL MATERIAL HARMFUL TO MINORS.

HOUSE BILL 908
(B) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO ANY BONA FIDE NEWS OR PUBLIC
INTEREST BROADCAST, WEBSITE VIDEO, REPORT, OR EVENT AND MAY NOT BE
CONSTRUED TO AFFECT THE RIGHTS OF ANY NEWS–GATHERING ORGANIZATION
EMPLOYEES.
(C) (1) A COMMERCIAL ENTITY THAT KNOWINGLY AND INTENTIONALLY
DISTRIBUTES SEXUAL MATERIAL HARMFUL TO MINORS ON THE INTERNET FROM A
WEBSITE THAT CONTAINS A SUBSTANTIAL PORTION OF SEXUAL MATERIAL HARMFUL
TO MINORS SHALL PERFORM REASONABLE AGE VERIFICATION METHODS TO VERIFY
THE AGE OF INDIVIDUALS ATTEMPTING TO ACCESS THE MATERIAL.
(2) A COMMERCIAL ENTITY OR THIRD PARTY THAT PERFORMS AN
AGE VERIFICATION REQUIRED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION MAY NOT RETAIN ANY
IDENTIFYING INFORMATION ABOUT INDIVIDUALS ATTEMPTING TO ACCESS SEXUAL
MATERIAL HARMFUL TO MINORS AFTER ACCESS TO THE MATERIAL HAS BEEN
GRANTED OR DENIED.
(D) (1) A PARENT OR LEGAL GUARDIAN OF A MINOR MAY BRING AN
ACTION AGAINST A COMMERCIAL ENTITY THAT VIOLATES SUBSECTION (C)(1) OF
THIS SECTION FOR DAMAGES RESULTING FROM THE MINOR ACCESSING SEXUAL
MATERIAL HARMFUL TO MINORS.
(2) A PERSON MAY BRING AN ACTION AGAINST A COMMERCIAL
ENTITY THAT VIOLATES SUBSECTION (C)(2) OF THIS SECTION FOR DAMAGES
RESULTING FROM THE RETENTION OF IDENTIFYING INFORMATION OF AN
INDIVIDUAL.
(3) A COURT MAY AWARD COSTS, REASONABLE ATTORNEY’S FEES,
AND ANY OTHER RELIEF THE COURT CONSIDERS APPROPRIATE TO A PREVAILING
PLAINTIFF UNDER THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.